Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-148
Unauthorized vouchers; issuance; effect; malfeasance in office; punishment.

No voucher issued by any such department, institution or agency upon the Director of Administrative Services shall be questioned by him or by the State Treasurer on the ground that sections 83-144 to 83-152 shall not have been complied with by the department, institution or agency; but intentional violation of the provisions of such sections by any department, institution or agency continued after notice in writing from the Department of Correctional Services to desist, shall constitute malfeasance in office, and shall subject the officer, officers or public employees responsible for the violations to suspension or removal from office, in the manner provided by law in other cases of malfeasance.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 5, p. 679;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-960;

R.S.1943, § 83-148;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 31.